Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Chapter 44

Salvage House Operators

62-44-101. Recordkeeping requirements.

Any person, firm, corporation or other entity operating a salvage house, by which is meant all persons in any way buying, selling, exchanging, trading or dealing in surplused or used building materials of any sort within the state, shall keep a record of the names of all persons from whom the person, firm, corporation or entity buys or gets surplused or used building materials of any sort, the date of purchase, the amount paid for the building materials, the kind of building materials purchased or gotten and the amount of each kind. The records shall be kept in chronological order from day to day, as the business is transacted. The records shall at all times be open to inspection of the police or other officer or any person who may desire to see the records and shall be in good faith kept and preserved by the dealers for convenient inspection.

Acts 1997, ch. 132, § 2.

62-44-102. Identification of seller.

All dealers in used or surplused building materials shall obtain from the seller of the used or surplused building materials proper identification consisting of the seller's name and address and the seller's driver license number or vehicle license plate number or social security number.

In lieu of obtaining any of the above identification, if the seller is a building materials dealer who has registered with the county clerk in accordance with § 67-4-706, the seller shall provide an invoice, which shall include the name and address of the dealer or provide a sworn affidavit, including the name and address of the seller, the name and address of the person, firm or source from whom or which the seller acquired the used or surplused building materials and the condition and quantity of the used or surplused building materials.

All dealers shall keep the records for a period of three (3) years and the records shall be filed by date of purchase.

Acts 1997, ch. 132, § 6.

Cross-References. Penalty for violation, § 62-44-105.

62-44-103. Dealers to cooperate with officers investigating seller.

Dealers shall promptly give to any officers or other persons inquiring of them information to enable the seller to be identified or any information that the dealer may have that will lead to the identification of the seller.

The failure on the part of the dealer to give the information on demand shall render the dealer guilty of a violation of this chapter.

Acts 1997, ch. 132, § 4.

62-44-104. Materials not to be commingled for ten (10) days after purchase.

The dealers shall keep on hand and in separate packages and not allow to be mixed or confused with other purchases, in order that identification may be easy, all surplused or used building materials bought or gotten from any person, the building materials, to be kept separate and subject to easy and convenient inspection of anyone desiring to investigate for a period of no less than ten (10) days after purchase or in any way acquired.

Acts 1997, ch. 132, § 3.

62-44-105. Penalty.

A violation of this chapter is a Class C misdemeanor.

The court trying the case has the power to remit the term of imprisonment provided for a Class C misdemeanor for the first offense.

Acts 1997, ch. 132, § 5.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Chapters 45-49

[Reserved]